Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.650.035

Gifts, grants, and endowments.

The superintendent of public instruction may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of educational technology and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3; 1993 c 336 s 708.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 9: "This act takes effect July 1, 2010." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 11.]